District of Columbia statutes.
2-571

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Open Meetings Act”.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 401
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734
This section is referenced in § 1-1161.01, § 10-1906, and § 31-3171.11.